liblouis-back-translation-tables/en-us-g3-abk.ctb
word welkin's 12456-123-13-35-3-234
word welling 12456-123-123-346
word wellness 12456-123-123-56-234
word wellness's 12456-123-123-56-234-3-234
word wellington 12456-123-123-346-2345-135-1345
word wellington's 12456-123-123-346-2345-135-1345-3-234
word wellingtons 12456-123-123-346-2345-135-1345-234
word weal's 12456-1-123-3-234
word weals 12456-1-123-234
word wellies 12456-123-123-24-15-234
word well's 12456-123-123-3-234
word wells 12456-123-123-234
word wellspring 12456-123-123-234-1234-1235-346
word wellspring's 12456-123-123-234-1234-1235-346-3-234
word wellsprings 12456-123-123-234-1234-1235-346-234
word weld 12456-123-145
word welder 12456-123-145-12456
word welled 12456-123-123-1246
word welt 12456-123-2345
word welter 12456-123-2345-12456
word weldable 12456-123-145-1-3456
word welding 12456-123-145-346
word welting 12456-123-2345-346
word weltering 12456-123-2345-12456-346
word weltered 12456-123-2345-12456-1246
word welder's 12456-123-145-12456-3-234
word welders 12456-123-145-12456-234
word weld's 12456-123-145-3-234
word welds 12456-123-145-234
word welter's 12456-123-2345-12456-3-234
word welters 12456-123-2345-12456-234
word welt's 12456-123-2345-3-234
word welts 12456-123-2345-234
word welded 12456-123-145-1246
word welted 12456-123-2345-1246
word welterweight 12456-123-2345-12456
word welterweight's 12456-123-2345-12456
word welterweights 12456-123-2345-12456
word welsh 12456-123-146
word welsher 12456-123-146-12456
word welshing 12456-123-146-346
word welsher's 12456-123-146-12456-3-234
word welshers 12456-123-146-12456-234
word welshes 12456-123-146-15-234
word welshed 12456-123-146-1246
word wean 12456-1-1345
word weeing 12456-15-346
word ween 12456-26
word weenie 12456-26-24-15
word weenier 12456-26-24-12456
word weeny 12456-26-13456
word wen 12456-1345
word weaning 12456-1-1345-346
word weening 12456-26-346
word weans 12456-1-1345-234
word weenie's 12456-26-24-15-3-234
word weenies 12456-26-24-15-234
word weens 12456-26-234
word weensier 12456-26-234-24-12456
word weensy 12456-26-234-13456
word wen's 12456-1345-3-234
word wens 12456-1345-234
word weensiest 12456-26-234-24-15-34
word weeniest 12456-26-24-15-34
word weaned 12456-1-1345-1246
word weened 12456-26-1246
word wend 12456-1345-145
word went 12456-1345-2345
word wending 12456-1345-145-346
word wends 12456-1345-145-234
word wended 12456-1345-145-1246
word wench 12456-1345-16
word wenches 12456-1345-16-15-234
word wench's 12456-1345-16-3-234
word weep 12456-15-1234
word weeper 12456-15-1234-12456
word weepie 12456-15-1234-24-15
word weepier 12456-15-1234-24-12456
word weepy 12456-15-1234-13456
word weapon 12456-1-1234-135-1345
word weeping 12456-15-1234-346
word weaponless 12456-1-1234-135-1345-46-234
word weaponry 12456-1-1234-135-1345-1235-13456
word weaponry's 12456-1-1234-135-1345-1235-13456-3-234
word weaponize 12456-1-1234-135-1345-24-1356-15
word weapon's 12456-1-1234-135-1345-3-234
word weapons 12456-1-1234-135-1345-234
word weepings 12456-15-1234-346-234
word weaponizing 12456-1-1234-135-1345-24-1356-346
word weaponizes 12456-1-1234-135-1345-24-1356-15-234
word weaponized 12456-1-1234-135-1345-24-1356-1246
word weeper's 12456-15-1234-12456-3-234
word weepers 12456-15-1234-12456-234
word weepies 12456-15-1234-24-15-234
word weep's 12456-15-1234-3-234
word weeps 12456-15-1234-234
word weepy's 12456-15-1234-13456-3-234
word weepiest 12456-15-1234-24-15-34
word wept 12456-1234-2345
word wearer 12456-345-12456
word wearier 12456-345-24-12456
word weary 12456-345-13456
word we're 12456-3-1235-15
word were 12456-1235-15
word wearable 12456-345-1-3456
word wearily 12456-345-24-123-13456
word wearing 12456-345-346
word weariness 12456-345-24-56-234
word weariness's 12456-345-24-56-234-3-234
word wearings 12456-345-346-234
word weren't 12456-1235-26-3-2345
word wearer's 12456-345-12456-3-234
word wearers 12456-345-12456-234
word wearies 12456-345-24-15-234
word wearisome 12456-345-24-5-234
word wearisomely 12456-345-24-5-234-123-13456
word weariest 12456-345-24-15-34
word wearied 12456-345-24-1246
word werewolf 12456-1235-15-2456-135-123-124
word werewolf's 12456-1235-15-2456-135-123-124-3-234
word werewolves 12456-1235-15-2456-135-123-1236-15-234
word wearying 12456-345-13456-346
word wear's 12456-345-3-234
word wears 12456-345-234
word wee's 12456-15-3-234
word wees 12456-15-234
word weigh's 12456-24-126-3-234
word weighs 12456-24-126-234
word weir's 12456-24-1235-3-234
word weirs 12456-24-1235-234
word weasel 12456-1-234-15-123
word weaselly 12456-1-234-15-123-123-13456
word weasel's 12456-1-234-15-123-3-234
word weasels 12456-1-234-15-123-234
word weest 12456-15-34
word west 12456-34
word westbound 12456-34-12-46-145
word westerly 12456-34-12456-123-13456
word westerlies 12456-34-12456-123-24-15-234
word westerly's 12456-34-12456-123-13456-3-234
word western 12456-34-12456-1345
word westerner 12456-34-12456-1345-12456
word westernmost 12456-34-12456-1345-134-135-34
word westerner's 12456-34-12456-1345-12456-3-234
word westerners 12456-34-12456-1345-12456-234
word western's 12456-34-12456-1345-3-234
word westerns 12456-34-12456-1345-234
word west's 12456-34-3-234
word westward 12456-34-2456-345-145
word westwards 12456-34-2456-345-145-234
word we'd 12456-3-145
word wed 12456-145
word wedder 12456-256-12456
word weed 12456-1246
word weeder 12456-1246-12456
word weedier 12456-1246-24-12456
word weedy 12456-1246-13456
word weight 12456-24-126-2345
word weightier 12456-24-126-2345-24-12456
word weighty 12456-24-126-2345-13456
word weird 12456-24-1235-145
word weirder 12456-24-1235-145-12456
word weirdie 12456-24-1235-145-24-15
word weirdo 12456-24-1235-145-135
word wet 12456-2345
word wetter 12456-2345-2345-12456
word wetback 12456-2345-12-1-14-13
word wetback's 12456-2345-12-1-14-13-3-234
word wetbacks 12456-2345-12-1-14-13-234
word weedkiller 12456-1246-13-24-123-123-12456
word weedkillers 12456-1246-13-24-123-123-12456-234
word wedging 12456-145-1245-346
word weightily 12456-24-126-2345-24-123-13456
word weirdly 12456-24-1235-145-123-13456
word wetly 12456-2345-123-13456
word weightlifter 12456-24-126-2345-123-24-124-2345-12456
word weightlifting 12456-24-126-2345-123-24-124-2345-346
word weightlifting's 12456-24-126-2345-123-24-124-2345-346-3-234
word weightlifter's 12456-24-126-2345-123-24-124-2345-12456-3-234
word weightlifters 12456-24-126-2345-123-24-124-2345-12456-234
word wedlock 12456-145-123-135-14-13
word wedlock's 12456-145-123-135-14-13-3-234
word wetland 12456-2345-123-12346
word wetland's 12456-2345-123-12346-3-234
word wetlands 12456-2345-123-12346-234
word weedless 12456-1246-46-234
word weightless 12456-24-126-2345-46-234
word weightlessly 12456-24-126-2345-46-234-123-13456
word weightlessness 12456-24-126-2345-46-234-56-234
word weightlessness's 12456-24-126-2345-46-234-56-234-3-234
word wedding 12456-256-346
word weeding 12456-1246-346
word weighting 12456-24-126-2345-346
word wetting 12456-2345-2345-346
word wedding's 12456-256-346-3-234
word weddings 12456-256-346-234
word weightiness 12456-24-126-2345-24-56-234
word weightiness's 12456-24-126-2345-24-56-234-3-234
word weightings 12456-24-126-2345-346-234
word weirdness 12456-24-1235-145-56-234
word weirdness's 12456-24-1235-145-56-234-3-234
word wetness 12456-2345-56-234
word wetness's 12456-2345-56-234-3-234
word weds 12456-145-234
word weeder's 12456-1246-12456-3-234
word weeders 12456-1246-12456-234
word weed's 12456-1246-3-234
word weeds 12456-1246-234
word weight's 12456-24-126-2345-3-234
word weights 12456-24-126-2345-234
word weirdie's 12456-24-1235-145-24-15-3-234
word weirdies 12456-24-1235-145-24-15-234
word weirdo's 12456-24-1235-145-135-3-234
word weirdos 12456-24-1235-145-135-234
word wet's 12456-2345-3-234
word wets 12456-2345-234
word wetter's 12456-2345-2345-12456-3-234
word wetters 12456-2345-2345-12456-234
word weediest 12456-1246-24-15-34
word weightiest 12456-24-126-2345-24-15-34
word weirdest 12456-24-1235-145-15-34
word wettest 12456-2345-2345-15-34
word wedded 12456-256-1246
word weeded 12456-1246-1246
word weighted 12456-24-126-2345-1246
word wetware 12456-2345-2456-345-15
word wetwares 12456-2345-2456-345-15-234
word weatherize 12456-1-2346-1235-24-1356-15
word weatherizing 12456-1-2346-1235-24-1356-346
word weatherizes 12456-1-2346-1235-24-1356-15-234
word weatherized 12456-1-2346-1235-24-1356-1246
word weaseling 12456-1-234-15-123-346
word weaseled 12456-1-234-15-123-1246
word westernize 12456-34-12456-1345-24-1356-15
word westernizing 12456-34-12456-1345-24-1356-346
word westernizes 12456-34-12456-1345-24-1356-15-234
word westernized 12456-34-12456-1345-24-1356-1246
word westernization 12456-34-12456-1345-24-1356-6-1345
word westernization's 12456-34-12456-1345-24-1356-6-1345-3-234
word frequent 124-1235-12345
word frequenter 124-1235-12345-12456
word frequently 124-1235-12345-123-13456
word frequenting 124-1235-12345-346
word frequenter's 124-1235-12345-12456-3-234
word frequenters 124-1235-12345-12456-234
word frequents 124-1235-12345-234
word frequentest 124-1235-12345-15-34
word frequented 124-1235-12345-1246
word few 124-2456
word fewness 124-2456-56-234
word fewness's 124-2456-56-234-3-234
word few's 124-2456-3-234
word fewer 124-2456-12456
word fewest 124-2456-15-34
word general 1245-26
word generally 1245-26-123-13456
word general's 1245-26-3-234
word generals 1245-26-234
word generalissimo 1245-26-24-234-234-24-134-135
word generalissimo's 1245-26-24-234-234-24-134-135-3-234
word generalissimos 1245-26-24-234-234-24-134-135-234
word generalist 1245-26-24-34
word generalist's 1245-26-24-34-3-234
word generalists 1245-26-24-34-234
word generality 1245-26-56-13456
word generalities 1245-26-24-2345-24-15-234
word generality's 1245-26-56-13456-3-234
word generalship 1245-26-146-24-1234
word generalship's 1245-26-146-24-1234-3-234
word generalize 1245-26-24-1356-15
word generalizing 1245-26-24-1356-346
word generalizes 1245-26-24-1356-15-234
word generalized 1245-26-24-1356-1246
word generalization 1245-26-24-1356-6-1345
word generalization's 1245-26-24-1356-6-1345-3-234
word generalizations 1245-26-24-1356-6-1345-234
word govern 1245-135-1236
word governor 1245-135-1236-135-1235
word governable 1245-135-1236-1-3456
word government 1245-135-1236-56-2345
word governmental 1245-135-1236-56-2345-1-123
word government's 1245-135-1236-56-2345-3-234
word governments 1245-135-1236-56-2345-234
word governing 1245-135-1236-346
word governance 1245-135-1236-46-15
word governance's 1245-135-1236-46-15-3-234
word governess 1245-135-1236-15-234-234
word governess's 1245-135-1236-15-234-234-3-234
word governor's 1245-135-1236-135-1235-3-234
word governors 1245-135-1236-135-1235-234
word governs 1245-135-1236-234
word governesses 1245-135-1236-15-234-234-15-234
word governed 1245-135-1236-1246
word governorship 1245-135-1236-135-1235-146-24-1234
word governorship's 1245-135-1236-135-1235-146-24-1234-3-234
word get 1245-2345
word getting 1245-2345-2345-346
word getup 1245-2345-136-1234
word getup's 1245-2345-136-1234-3-234
word gets 1245-2345-234
word getaway 1245-2345-1-2456-1-13456
word getaway's 1245-2345-1-2456-1-13456-3-234
word getaways 1245-2345-1-2456-1-13456-234
word help 125-123-1234
word helper 125-123-1234-12456
word helpful 125-123-1234-56-123
word helpfully 125-123-1234-56-123-123-13456
word helpfulness 125-123-1234-56-123-56-234
word helpfulness's 125-123-1234-56-123-56-234-3-234
word helpline 125-123-1234-123-35-15
word helpline's 125-123-1234-123-35-15-3-234
word helplines 125-123-1234-123-35-15-234
word helpless 125-123-1234-46-234
word helplessly 125-123-1234-46-234-123-13456
word helplessness 125-123-1234-46-234-56-234
word helplessness's 125-123-1234-46-234-56-234-3-234
word helpmate 125-123-1234-134-1-2345-15
word helpmate's 125-123-1234-134-1-2345-15-3-234
word helpmates 125-123-1234-134-1-2345-15-234
word helping 125-123-1234-346
word helping's 125-123-1234-346-3-234
word helpings 125-123-1234-346-234
word helper's 125-123-1234-12456-3-234
word helpers 125-123-1234-12456-234
